Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5959.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 34 of the General Laws entitled "PROPERTY" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 50
PUBLIC AUCTIONS BY ELECTRONIC OR REMOTE PROCEDURES
34-50-1. Public auctions of real estate.
(a) Public auctions by any city or town of real estate or an interest therein for any reason
or purpose tax sales shall only be done in person at the time and place specified in the legal
advertisement, and in accordance with Rhode Island statutes that govern said sales.
(b) No public auction of real estate or an interest therein shall be done by electronic or
remote procedures unless authorized by court order of the Rhode Island superior court after a
hearing thereon and a finding that an in-person auction is not feasible under the circumstances of
the specific case.
(c) The purpose of this section is to bring greater public scrutiny to the public auction sales
of real estate in Rhode Island.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002114
========